District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Great Streets Program Expansion Neighborhood Retail Priority
Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 4 of the Retail Incentive Act of 2004, effective September 8, 2004 (D.C.
Law 15-185; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.73), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (o) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “beginning at the intersection of Euclid Street, N.W., and
Georgia Avenue, N.W.; continuing north along Georgia Avenue, N.W., to Kenyon Street, N.W.;
thence continuing west along Kenyon Street, N.W., to Sherman Avenue, N.W.; continuing north
along Sherman Avenue, N.W., to New Hampshire Avenue, N.W.;” and insert the phrase
“beginning at the intersection of Howard Place, N.W., and 4th Street, N.W., thence continuing
west along Howard Place, N.W., to Georgia Avenue, N.W., thence continuing south along
Georgia Avenue, N.W., to Barry Place, N.W., thence continuing west along Barry Place, N.W.,
to Sherman Avenue, N.W., thence continuing north along Sherman Avenue, N.W., to New
Hampshire Avenue, N.W.;” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “until the point where 7th Street, N.W., becomes Warder
Street, N.W.; thence continuing further south along Warder Street, N.W., to Kenyon Avenue,
N.W.; thence continuing west along Kenyon Avenue, N.W., to Georgia Avenue, N.W.; and
thence south on Georgia Avenue, N.W., to the beginning point.” and insert the phrase “, thence
continuing south along 7th Street, N.W., to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W., thence continuing
east along Rock Creek Church Road, N.W., to Park Place, N.W., thence continuing south along
Park Place, N.W. until the point where Park Place, N.W. becomes Hobart Place, N.W., thence
continuing west on Hobart Place, N.W. until the point where Hobart Place, N.W. becomes 5th
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Street, N.W., thence continuing south on 5th Street, N.W. to the point where 5th Street, N.W.
becomes 4th Street, N.W., continuing south on 4th Street, N.W. to Howard Place, N.W., and
thence west on Howard Place, N.W., to the beginning point.” in its place.
(b) Subsection (r) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) The area bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the center lines of
2nd Street, S.E., and Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.; continuing southeast along the center line of
Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., to K Street, S.E.; continuing north and circumferentially along the
center line of Barney Circle, S.E.”.
(c) Subsection (s) is amended by striking the phrase “continuing southwest along the
center line of New York Avenue, N.W.,” and inserting the phrase “continuing northeast along
the center line of New York Avenue, N.W., to the center line of New Jersey Avenue, N.W.;
continuing southeast along the center line of New Jersey Avenue, N.W., to the center line of
Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; continuing northwest along the center line of Massachusetts
Avenue, N.W. to the center line of 7th Street N.W.; continuing north along the center line of 7th
Street N.W.,” in its place.
(d) New subsections (t) and (u) are added to read as follows:
“(t) There is established the Eastern Market Retail Priority Area, which shall consist of
the parcels, squares, and lots within or abutting the boundary of the following area: Beginning at
the intersection of North Carolina Avenue, S.E., and 6th Street, S.E.; continuing northeast along
the center line of North Carolina Avenue, S.E., to the center line of 8th Street, S.E.; continuing
south along the center line of 8th Street S.E., to the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E.;
continuing northwest along the center line of Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., to the center line of 6th
Street, S.E., continuing north along the center line of 6th Street, S.E., to the beginning point.
“(u) There is established the Barracks Row Retail Priority Area, which shall consist of
the parcels, squares, and lots within or abutting the boundary of the following area: Beginning at
the intersection of D Street, S.E., 7th Street, S.E., and South Carolina Avenue, S.E.; continuing
east along the center line of D Street, S.E., to the center line of 8th Street, S.E.; continuing south
along the center line of 8th Street, S.E., to the center line of M Street, S.E.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of February 4, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
89 D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3